Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.050

Renewal of licenses—Continuing education requirements—Information about current professional practice.

(1) The board may establish rules and regulations governing mandatory continuing education requirements which shall be met by physicians applying for renewal of licenses. Administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees for applications and renewals shall be established as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The board shall determine prerequisites for relicensing.

(2) The board must request licensees to submit information about their current professional practice at the time of license renewal and licensees must provide the information requested. This information may include practice setting, medical specialty, board certification, or other relevant data determined by the board.

[ 2015 c 252 s 10; 1996 c 191 s 36; 1991 c 160 s 6; (1991 c 3 s 149 repealed by 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 2); 1985 c 7 s 55; 1979 c 117 s 12; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 58; 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 11; 1919 c 4 s 6; RRS s 10058. Cf. 1909 c 192 s 7. Formerly RCW 18.57.050 and 18.57.120.]

NOTES:

Intent—2015 c 252: See note following RCW 70.112.010.